Ohio, session 136, HB764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.141 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.141. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of United States route number forty-two between Tarbox Cemetery road and James Barber road, in Greene county, shall be known as the "Patrolman Charles G. Cannon Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.